Washington statutes.
RCW 40.20.030

Use as original.

Such photostatic copy, photograph, microphotograph or photographic film record, or copy of the original records shall be deemed to be an original record for all purposes, and shall be admissible in evidence in all courts or administrative agencies. A facsimile, exemplification or certified copy thereof shall, for all purposes recited herein, be deemed to be a transcript, exemplification or certified copy of the original.

[ 1949 c 223 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 1257-5.]